Tennessee, session 114, HB0138.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 11, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
(a) There is established a special fund to be known as the career and technical
education curriculum fund, hereinafter referred to as the fund.
(b) It is the general assembly's intent that the fund consists of an annual
recurring appropriation of five million dollars ($5,000,000) from the general fund.
(c) Moneys in the fund must be used exclusively to provide grants to LEAs and
public charter schools for the acquisition, retention, or expansion of digital career and
technical education curricula through platforms that contain comprehensive courses with
lesson plans, media rich content and activities, and interactive assessments.
(d) The department of education shall administer the fund and establish
procedures for LEAs and public charter schools to apply for grants awarded pursuant to
this section. The procedures must include, but are not limited to:
(1) Application requirements and deadlines to apply for grants;
(2) Criteria for awarding grants, which allow the department to consider
factors such as the LEA's or public charter school's demonstrated need, the
potential impact on students, and alignment with workforce development goals;
and
HB0138
000406
- 1 -

(3) Reporting requirements for LEAs and public charter schools that
receive grants to ensure accountability and measure program effectiveness.
(e) Any unencumbered moneys and any unexpended balance of the fund
remaining at the end of a fiscal year do not revert to the general fund, but must be
carried forward until expended in accordance with this section. Moneys in the fund shall
not be diverted to the general fund or any other public fund.
SECTION 2. This act is not an appropriation of funds, and funds must not be obligated
or expended pursuant to this act unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general
appropriations act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000406